Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.822

Exemption—Solicitation for regional or national legislative association conferences.

(1) When soliciting gifts, grants, or donations to a regional or national legislative association for an official conference held outside the state of Washington, legislators who serve as elected leaders of the association and designated legislative employees are presumed not to be in violation of the solicitation and receipt of gift provisions of this chapter.

(2) For purposes of this section, any regional or national legislative association is any organization which:

(a) Exists for the purpose of supporting legislators in the execution of their official duties;

(b) Includes among its membership the Washington state legislature; and

(c) Is supported in part by the payment of annual dues by the Washington state legislature.

[ 2023 c 91 s 1.]